New Jersey, session 222, S3703.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  The governing body of a municipality may enact an ordinance establishing criteria under which the municipality is authorized to notify an insurance company which insures a rental property if there is activity at the rental property that is reasonably observable without entering and inspecting the premises which is suspected to violate the general terms of the rental property insurance policy.  The criteria may include, but not be limited to, activity such as: (1)   excessive, ongoing noise violations; (2)   visible, dangerous overcrowding; (3)   underage drinking or illegal drug use; (4)   property destruction or vandalism; (5)   fighting or violence; and (6)   reckless behavior endangering neighbors or neighborhood properties. b.    The governing body of a municipality shall designate an official who shall be responsible for notifying an insurance company pursuant to this section, in a time and manner as determined by the governing body, of any reasonably observable behavior, pursuant to subsection a. of this section, which is suspected to violate the general terms of the rental property insurance policy. c.     Notwithstanding any law, rule, or regulation to the contrary, a municipality shall be authorized to request from an owner of a rental property a copy of the terms of the rental property insurance policy. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.